Massachusetts, session 194th, S423.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1Q of Chapter 69 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking paragraph (b) and replacing it with the following:-
(b) A school district, charter school, approved private day or residential school or
collaborative school shall incorporate the financial literacy standards established pursuant to
section 1D and subsection (a) into existing curriculum including, but not limited to, mathematics,
history and social sciences, technology or business.
SECTION 2. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
new section:-
Section 98. (a) In all public schools, financial literacy shall be taught as required subjects
to promote an understanding of personal finances and financial stability. Instruction shall include
of 2

(i) loans; (ii) interest and interest accrual; (iii) credit card debt; (iv) online commerce; (v) rights
and responsibilities of renting or buying a home; (vi) saving, investing and planning for
retirement; (vii) the role of banking and financial services; (viii) balancing a checkbook; (ix)
state and federal taxes; (x) charitable giving; (xi) evaluating media content, including online
content, that relates to personal finance matters; and (xii) saving, investing and planning for
higher education or professional training.
SECTION 3. The department may apply for federal, state or other funding, including
funding available through the Economic Empowerment Trust Fund established pursuant to
section 35QQ of chapter 10 to implement the provisions of this section.
of 2